Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1709
Commodity merchant, defined.

Commodity merchant shall mean any of the following, as defined or described in the Commodity Exchange Act or by CFTC rule:

(1) Futures commission merchant;

(2) Commodity pool operator;

(3) Commodity trading advisor;

(4) Introducing broker;

(5) Leverage transaction merchant;

(6) An associated person of any of the foregoing;

(7) Floor broker; and

(8) Any other person, other than a futures association, required to register with the Commodity Futures Trading Commission.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 9.